Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-110. Rights of relatives.

If a relative has reason to believe coupled with facts to substantiate his or her belief that the guardian of a ward or another person is unreasonably interfering with or denying visitation between the relative and the ward, the relative may file a petition for reasonable visitation with the ward in a court with jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter that concern the ward.

A petition for reasonable visitation filed under this section shall be verified and shall state:

Whether the petitioner is a relative as defined under § 28-65-101;

Whether the guardian or other person is unreasonably interfering with or denying visitation between the petitioner and the ward;

The identity of the guardian or other person alleged to be unreasonably interfering with or denying visitation between the petitioner and the ward; and

The facts supporting the petitioner's allegation that the guardian or other person is unreasonably interfering with or denying visitation between the petitioner and the ward.

A petition for reasonable visitation filed under this section shall be served on all parties to a guardianship proceeding that is initiated under this chapter and concerns the ward who is the subject of the petition for reasonable visitation.

A relative who files a petition for reasonable visitation under this section is not a party to a guardianship proceeding described under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.

If a ward objects to visitation with the petitioner, the petitioner shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the ward was unduly influenced by the guardian or another person.

If the ward consents to visitation with the petitioner, does not object to visitation with the petitioner, or is unable to express his or her consent or objection to visitation with the petitioner, the guardian or other person shall prove one (1) or more of the following conditions by a preponderance of the evidence in order to overcome the presumption that visitation between the petitioner and the ward is in the best interest of the ward:

The petitioner physically abused, exploited, neglected, sexually abused, or otherwise maltreated the ward or another adult; or

Visitation between the petitioner and the ward would be harmful to the mental health or physical well-being of the ward.

An order issued by the court granting or denying a petition for reasonable visitation filed under this section shall include statements of fact and law supporting the court's order.

If the court grants the petition for reasonable visitation, then:

The court may impose reasonable restrictions on visitation between the petitioner and the ward;

The petitioner shall be responsible for paying costs associated with the visitation, including, but not limited to, transportation and supervision costs;

Visitation shall not occur in a manner that negatively impacts the ward's medical or treatment needs;

If the ward is placed in a facility, visitation shall occur at the facility;

Visitation shall be subject to the rules of the facility in which the ward is placed; and

The court may impose on the guardian or other person alleged to have unreasonably interfered with or denied visitation between the petitioner and the ward the cost of filing a petition for reasonable visitation under this section and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the petitioner as a result of the guardian's or other person's opposing the petition if the guardian or other person:

Unreasonably interfered with or denied visitation between the petitioner and the ward; and

Opposed visitation between the petitioner and the ward in bad faith.

If the court denies the petition for reasonable visitation, the:

Petitioner may file another petition for reasonable visitation no earlier than one (1) year after the date on which the court enters the order denying visitation if there is a material change in circumstances; and

Court may impose on the petitioner the costs of opposing the petition, including without limitation the costs for subpoenas, witness fees, and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the guardian or other person alleged to have unreasonably interfered with or denied visitation between the petitioner and the ward.

The court shall not impose costs on:

A person or entity that in good faith interfered with or denied visitation at the direction of the guardian or other person; and

The ward.

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 535, § 3: Apr. 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Supreme Court recently invalidated Arkansas' Temporary Guardianship Law; that this Act is designed to meet the court's objections to the previous law; that until this Act goes into effect, there will be no Temporary Guardianship Law; and that a temporary guardianship law is immediately necessary in order to adequately protect incapacitated persons. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 11, § 5: Feb. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in appointing a guardian for a minor child the court should give due regard to any written instrument executed by the legal custodian of the minor child; and this act is immediately necessary to insure that an appropriate guardian is appointed for a minor child. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1295, § 5: Apr. 22, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that the existing temporary guardianship statute does not provide for notice to parents of minors for whom temporary guardianships have been appointed; that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides due process to parents of minors for whom temporary guardians are appointed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force and effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 5, provided: “This act shall take effect upon the occurrence of the following: (1)The Director of the Division of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that adequate appropriation, funding, and positions are available to carry out a public guardianship program for adults; and (2)The director appoints an employee of the Division of Aging and Adult Services to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.” This contingency is deemed to have been met by Acts 2009, No. 433.

ALR.

Validity of guardianship proceeding based on brainwashing of subject by religious, political, or social organization. 44 A.L.R.4th 1207.

Am. Jur. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guar. & W., § 34 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Brantley, Use of the Trust to Manage Property of the Elderly or Disabled, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 619.

C.J.S. 39 C.J.S., Guar. & W., § 7 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Probate, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 597.

The Supreme Court declined to adopt a proposal granting a probate judge jurisdiction to appoint a trustee for a lawyer who was disabled, deceased, or had disappeared, since this proposal would have clearly conflicted with the statutory scheme for establishing a guardianship for an incompetent attorney as well as the statutory scheme for decedent's estates under former similar statutes and since there were express statutes which conflicted with the proposal for attorneys who had disappeared. In re Committee on Professional Ethics, 273 Ark. 496, 621 S.W.2d 223 (1981) (decision under prior law).

Mere physical presence of incompetent, who had resided in sister state for 68 years, was a proper basis of jurisdiction in this state of her person and estate. In re Powers, 311 Ark. 101, 841 S.W.2d 626 (1992).

Where the physical condition of a party has lessened his mental faculties, a guardian could be appointed. Parker v. Parker, 231 Ark. 635, 331 S.W.2d 694 (1960) (decision under prior law).

As a general rule, it may be stated that, in order to have that measure of capacity required by law to be of sound mind, a person must have capacity enough to comprehend and understand the nature and effect of the business he is doing; and where it is clearly made to appear that the mental capacity and imbecility is of such a degree as to render the person unable to conduct the ordinary affairs of life and leaves him in a condition to be the victim of his infirmity, then such person is in contemplation of law not of sound mind. Weakness of understanding is not alone sufficient to show mental unsoundness if capacity remains to see things in their true relations and where the individual has a moderate comprehension of his immediate duties and of the value and use of his property. Deffenbaugh v. Estate of Claphan, 48 Ark. App. 208, 893 S.W.2d 350 (1995).

A court could not adjudge one incompetent for any reason other than minority without medical evidence. Sparks v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 435, 413 S.W.2d 865 (1967) (decision under prior law).

Where the petition for appointment of a guardian merely stated that a person was unable to care for herself because of physical impairment, the probate court had no jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for such a person, at least under the law at the time of the guardianship proceeding. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Earle v. Bennett, 289 Ark. 448, 711 S.W.2d 829 (1986); Hicks v. Bates, 104 Ark. App. 348, 292 S.W.3d 850 (2009).

If the incapacitated person is neither domiciled nor resides in this state, then in the county in this state in which his or her property, or the greater part of it in value, is situated.

In case of transfer, the receiving court shall complete the proceedings as if originally commenced in it.

Where guardianship proceedings were commenced first in one county by the filing of a petition in the probate court of that county on July 24, 1959, a guardianship proceeding filed on August 29, 1959, in another county should have been stayed until the determination of venue by the probate court of the first county. Watt v. Bryan, 231 Ark. 799, 332 S.W.2d 609 (1960) (decision under prior law).

Where the evidence showed that the maternal grandfather of a minor, whose father shot his mother to death in a heated argument, brought the minor to Arkansas from Texas, that the minor had lived with his grandparents in Arkansas for 10 months as of the date of the guardianship hearing, and that the minor attended public school in Arkansas and was engaged in church and athletic activities, a probate court in Arkansas had the jurisdiction to appoint the maternal grandfather as the guardian for the minor. Monroe v. Dallas, 6 Ark. App. 10, 636 S.W.2d 881 (1982) (decision under prior law).

A guardian who would have custody of a minor could be appointed by the probate court of a county in which he resides, even though he may be domiciled elsewhere. Shaw v. Shaw, 251 Ark. 665, 473 S.W.2d 848 (1971) (decision under prior law).

Where in a divorce action in Texas the custody of minor children was awarded to the father and the mother subsequently moved with the children to Arkansas where she filed a divorce petition seeking custody of the children, the physical presence of the children in Arkansas was a proper basis for an Arkansas court to determine whether there should be a change in custody of the children involved. Shaw v. Shaw, 251 Ark. 665, 473 S.W.2d 848 (1971) (decision under prior law).

The child at issue was domiciled in Phillips County and, therefore, venue there was proper where (1) before her mother's death, the child lived with her mother in Phillips County, and (2) the only reason the child was physically residing in Jefferson County after her mother's death was because the appellant had removed the child to that county pursuant to an order granting him temporary guardianship. Blunt v. Cartwright, 342 Ark. 662, 30 S.W.3d 737 (2000).

Cited: In re Pollock, 293 Ark. 195, 736 S.W.2d 6 (1987); Moore v. Sipes, 85 Ark. App. 15, 146 S.W.3d 903 (2004).

A resident of this state;

At least eighteen (18) years of age;

Of sound mind; and

Subject to the limitations in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, either:

Not a convicted and unpardoned felon; or

A convicted and unpardoned felon who has disclosed his or her prior felony conviction and for whom the court has entered written findings stating that, notwithstanding the felony conviction, he or she is otherwise qualified after reviewing a certified copy of the sentencing order.

Be the guardian of the person for an adult;

Be the guardian of the person for a minor who is not subject to a dependency-neglect proceeding under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., if the convicted and unpardoned felon is a relative or fictive kin as defined in § 9-28-402;

Be the guardian of the person for a minor who is subject to a dependency-neglect proceeding under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., if the convicted and unpardoned felon qualifies for guardianship under subsection (b) of this section; and

Not be the guardian of the estate for any person.

If a convicted and unpardoned felon fails to file a report or accounting required under this subchapter or by the court, the court shall set a hearing for the convicted and unpardoned felon to show cause as to why the guardianship should not be terminated.

However, notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a natural person who is a resident of this state, eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind, and a convicted and unpardoned felon whose home has been opened under § 9-28-409 either as a foster home or as an adoptive home is qualified to be a guardian of the person or estate of a minor in the custody of the Department of Human Services.

Any charitable organization or humane society incorporated under the laws of this state is qualified for appointment as guardian of the person and estate of a minor:

The minor has been abandoned by his or her parents; or

The minor's parents are incapacitated or unfit for the duties of guardianship; or

If no other suitable person can be found who is able and willing to assume the duties of guardianship.

(1)A parent under eighteen (18) years of age is qualified for appointment as guardian of the person of his or her child.

A corporation authorized to do business in this state and properly empowered by its charter to become guardian is qualified to serve as guardian of the estate of an incapacitated person.

A bank or similar institution with trust powers may be appointed guardian of the estate of an incapacitated person.

A nonresident natural person possessing the qualifications enumerated in this section, except as to residence, who has appointed a resident agent to accept service of process in any action or suit with respect to the guardianship and has caused the appointment to be filed with the court, whether or not he or she has been nominated by the will of the last surviving parent of a minor resident of this state to be appointed as guardian of the minor, is qualified for the appointment.

However, unless nominated by will, bond may not be dispensed with.

A person whom the court finds to be unsuitable to perform the duties incident to the appointment shall not be appointed guardian of the person or estate of an incapacitated person.

A sheriff, probate clerk of a circuit court, or deputy of either, or a circuit judge, shall not be appointed guardian of the person or estate of an incapacitated person unless the incapacitated person is related to him or her within the third degree of consanguinity.

Except as provided in subdivision (i)(4) of this section, a public agency or employee of any public agency acting in his or her official capacity shall not be appointed as guardian for any incapacitated person.

An employee of a public agency that provides direct services to the incapacitated person shall not be appointed guardian of the person or estate of the incapacitated person.

An employee of a public agency that provides direct services to the incapacitated person shall not be appointed as a temporary guardian.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Public Guardian for Adults may serve as guardian of the person or the estate, or both, of an incapacitated person receiving services from any public agency.

The department shall promulgate rules to implement this provision.

A person may be appointed temporary guardian of an incapacitated person notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (h) or subsection (k) of this section if he or she is related to the incapacitated person within the third degree of consanguinity and the court determines that any potential conflict of interest is unsubstantial and that the appointment is in the best interest of the ward.

A circuit court of this state shall not appoint a person or institution as the permanent custodian or permanent guardian of the person or estate of an adult in the custody of the department unless:

The department has evaluated the prospective guardian under the department's authority under § 9-20-122 and promulgated department policy; or

The department has evaluated the prospective custodian under the department's authority under § 9-20-122 and promulgated department policy.

A circuit court of this state shall not appoint an unrelated person, a related person that is not related within the fifth degree of consanguinity, or an institution as a permanent custodian or permanent guardian of the person or estate of an adopted juvenile unless at least twenty (20) days before the hearing the prospective guardian files a written home study that has been conducted by a licensed certified social worker.

The home study shall include a state-of-residence criminal background check, if available, and a national fingerprint-based criminal background check performed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in compliance with federal law and regulation on the prospective guardian and all household members eighteen (18) years of age and older.

If a prospective guardian has lived in another state for at least six (6) years immediately prior to guardianship, then only a state-of-residence criminal background check is required.

The home study shall address whether the home is a suitable home and shall include a recommendation as to the approval of the petitioner as a guardian.

The home study shall contain an evaluation of the guardian with a recommendation as to the granting of the petition for guardianship and any other information the court requires regarding the petitioner or the person.

The department shall not be ordered by any court to conduct a guardianship home study unless:

The court has first determined the responsible party to be indigent; and

The person to be studied lives in the State of Arkansas.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 862, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings.

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Many adults lack the capacity to provide informed consent to necessary health care, have not executed an advance health care directive or a durable power of attorney, and have no friend or family member qualified and willing to consent on their behalf; and

“(2)It is therefore necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety to provide for a public guardian who can make informed consent to needed medical and long-term care on behalf of incapacitated adults who are unable to consent for themselves and for whom there is no other person qualified and willing to consent.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (h)(4) and redesignated former (h)(4) as present (h)(5).

The 2009 amendment, in (b), deleted “The Department of Human Services or” preceding “charitable organization” in the introductory language, and deleted “department or” following “administered by” in (b)(1); inserted (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly; substituted “subdivision (h)(4)” for “subsection (b)” in (h)(1); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment added (b); redesignated former (b) through (i) as present (c) through (j); inserted “or subsection (k)” following “subsection (h)” in present (j); and added (k).

The 2013 amendment, in the introductory language of (b), deleted the phrase “the provisions in” after “notwithstanding,” inserted “whose home has been opened under §9-28-409 either as a foster home or as an adoptive home,” after “felon,” and deleted (b)(1) and (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment added (l) and (m).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a).

In a guardianship and conservatorship action, the trial court did not abuse its discretion by appointing a bank as the ward's conservator because the ward was incompetent to handle her finances, and the appointment was proper pursuant to subdivision (d)(2) of this section.Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 427, 379 S.W.3d 47 (2010).

Circuit court properly appointed a permanent guardian of a child and deemed the statute providing for such appointment constitutional because guardianship proceedings were “special proceedings” and excepted from the traditional Rules of Civil Procedure.Swenson v. Kane, 2014 Ark. 444, 447 S.W.3d 118 (2014).

A corporation was held not qualified to serve as guardian of the person. Bogan v. Ark. First Nat'l Bank, 249 Ark. 840, 462 S.W.2d 203 (1971) (decision under prior law).

Denial of paternal grandmother's petition for guardianship was affirmed because the grandmother did not meet the qualifications under subsection (a) of this section in that she failed to establish that she was not a convicted and unpardoned felon. Bailey v. Maxwell, 94 Ark. App. 358, 230 S.W.3d 282 (2006).

Court properly appointed an incapacitated person's brother, rather than her daughter, to be her guardian as the two had a loving brother and sister bond, they had a long history of working well in a business enterprise, and the brother had been a constant in the incapacitated person's life and had helped in providing for her care; further, the daughter had a long period of estrangement from her mother precipitated by her absconding to California with $46,000 of her mother's money and, after she reentered her mother's life, she made it difficult for others to see her mother and made unfounded accusations of theft. Martin v. Decker, 96 Ark. App. 45, 237 S.W.3d 502 (2006).

Circuit court did not err in appointing a sister as guardian over her sibling, an incapacitated adult, without holding a hearing to determine the sister's qualifications or making specific factual findings regarding her suitability because the record did not indicate that the circuit court ever refused any request by the brother to hold an evidentiary hearing or issue findings of fact; nothing in this section mandates a hearing or specific factual findings on the question of a guardian's ability to serve, and no such requirements are set forth in §28-65-210 .Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 793, 379 S.W.3d 716 (2010), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 284 (Ark. June 2, 2011).

Notwithstanding the contentions of a child's grandparents that appellee failed to establish that she was qualified or suitable to act as the child's guardian, the appellate court concluded there was ample evidence before the circuit court that appellee was qualified and suitable to serve as guardian. The circuit court's finding that appellee would be the better person to parent the child was supported, and the appellate court was not left with a definite and firm conviction that a mistake had been made.Brewer v. Bair-Massey (In re A.B.), 2018 Ark. App. 529, 562 S.W.3d 891 (2018).

A person who lived on an army post within the state of Arkansas was a resident within the meaning of former similar statute so as to be appointed guardian of an incompetent. Metcalfe v. Nichol, 225 Ark. 574, 283 S.W.2d 853 (1955) (decision under prior law).

The use of the word “domicile” in former statute similar to §28-65-202 showed that the legislature knew and appreciated the difference between residence and domicile in prescribing the qualifications of a guardian and intended only to require that a guardian be a resident. Metcalfe v. Nichol, 225 Ark. 574, 283 S.W.2d 853 (1955) (decision under prior law).

Prior to effective date of the 1949 Probate Code prohibiting a sheriff from acting as guardian of an incompetent, a probate court had the power to appoint a sheriff as a guardian of an incompetent person. In re Wilson, 216 Ark. 348, 225 S.W.2d 691 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Where a stepfather stood in loco parentis to his stepdaughter and she in loco filiae to him, the stepdaughter was entitled to be appointed guardian of the stepfather who became senile. Metcalfe v. Nichol, 225 Ark. 574, 283 S.W.2d 853 (1955) (decision under prior law).

Cited: In re Pollock, 293 Ark. 195, 736 S.W.2d 6 (1987).

Any request for the appointment of a person made by the spouse of an incapacitated person;

The relationship by blood or marriage to the person for whom guardianship is sought.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Family Law, 14 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 799.

The custody of a child was not awarded to gratify the feelings of either parent or with the idea of punishment or reward, but only from considerations for the best interests of the child. Page v. Page, 210 Ark. 430, 196 S.W.2d 580 (1946) (decision under prior law).

The harmful effect to young children of frequent changes in surroundings and environment could be entitled to controlling weight when, from the evidence, there is doubt as to what order should be made. Page v. Page, 210 Ark. 430, 196 S.W.2d 580 (1946) (decision under prior law).

Former statute did not make an ironclad order of priority where there was a dispute between relatives. It left it to the court to select that person as guardian, the appointment of whom would be for the best interests of the incompetent. McCartney v. Merchants & Planters Bank, 227 Ark. 80, 296 S.W.2d 407 (1956) (decision under prior law).

Since former statute gave no ironclad order of preference, a probate court did not abuse its discretion in the appointment of a bank as guardian of the person and estate of an incompetent, having in mind the best interests of the ward, in view of a sharp dispute between relatives. McCartney v. Merchants & Planters Bank, 227 Ark. 80, 296 S.W.2d 407 (1956) (decision under prior law).

A reading of former similar statute indicated that parental preference was only one of many factors to be considered in determining the one most suitable to serve as guardian. The statute did not make an ironclad order of priority; instead, it left to the probate court's sound discretion the appointment of a guardian who would forward the best interests of the ward. Monroe v. Dallas, 6 Ark. App. 10, 636 S.W.2d 881 (1982) (decision under prior law).

Former similar statute was couched in such terms as to allow a court to exercise its sound discretion and only granted a preference to the parents of a minor. Any inclination to appoint a relative as guardian of a minor child had to necessarily become subservient to the principle that the child's interest was of paramount consideration; the court needed only give due regard to those factors listed in the statute. Bennett v. McGough, 281 Ark. 414, 664 S.W.2d 476 (1984) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court did not err in awarding guardianship in favor of the maternal grandparents over the biological father where the father never had custody and it was in the child's best interests to remain with his grandparents. Freeman v. Rushton, 360 Ark. 445, 202 S.W.3d 485 (2005).

Where maternal grandparents were appointed guardians of their grandson after the mother's death, the father's petition to terminate the guardianship was properly denied because (1) some of the father's testimony was found to be not credible and the father had a smoking habit and a previous domestic-battery incident, and (2) the statutory natural-parent preference under subsection (a) of this section was subservient to the best interest of the child.Smith v. Thomas, 373 Ark. 427, 284 S.W.3d 476 (2008).

Order appointing appellee guardian of the minor child was affirmed because, in guardianship matters, the natural-parent preference was but one consideration, which was subservient to the principle that the child's best interest was the paramount consideration.Fletcher v. Scorza, 2010 Ark. 64, 359 S.W.3d 413 (2010), rehearing denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. LEXIS 170 (Mar. 18, 2010).

In guardianship proceedings for a child, a trial court's findings under subsection (a) of this section that an adoptive father was not qualified and suitable and staying in the adoptive father's custody would not be in the child's best interest were not clearly erroneous, as the adoptive father had never been the child's primary caregiver and had a long history of drug abuse.Hicks v. Faith, 2011 Ark. App. 330, 384 S.W.3d 17 (2011).

Aunt was properly appointed as the guardian of two children under §28-65-210 where it was in the best interest of the children in order to protect them from the effects of their mother's abusive relationship, and the aunt was qualified and suitable to act as the guardian. Even though the mother had ended the relationship and completed classes and counseling, the natural-parent preference was merely one facet of the case, and the mother was unable to provide for the emotional needs of the children.Gantt v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2013 Ark. App. 217 (2013).

Trial court did not err in finding that a ward's daughter was not a suitable guardian under subsection (b) of this section because, although they might have been close at one time, the ward was no longer close to the daughter and accused her of “playing games;” the ward was angry that the daughter did not attend her husband's funeral and that she was forced to return to Florida against her wishes.Johnson v. Mitchell, 2013 Ark. App. 498 (2013).

There was evidence to support the appointment of a guardian because it was not in the best interest of the child to be returned to a home where she did not feel safe; the mother disbelieved that the child had been sexually abused and chose her relationship with her boyfriend over her relationship with the child.Sherland v. Sherland, 2015 Ark. App. 342, 465 S.W.3d 3 (2015).

Notwithstanding the contentions of a child's grandparents that appellee failed to establish that she was qualified or suitable to act as the child's guardian, the appellate court concluded there was ample evidence before the circuit court that appellee was qualified and suitable to serve as guardian. The circuit court's finding that appellee would be the better person to parent the child was supported, and the appellate court was not left with a definite and firm conviction that a mistake had been made.Brewer v. Bair-Massey (In re A.B.), 2018 Ark. App. 529, 562 S.W.3d 891 (2018).

In view of grandfather's advanced age and ability of mother to furnish better school facilities, order transferring child to mother's custody would not be disturbed. Stone v. Crofton, 156 Ark. 323, 245 S.W. 827 (1922) (decision under prior law).

Upon a proper and sufficient showing that a change in a decree awarding the custody of children would be for the best interest of the children, a chancery court may order the change. Hamilton v. Anderson, 176 Ark. 76, 2 S.W.2d 673 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Where after a divorce awarding the custody of a child to its father the parents were remarried, there was such a change in the circumstances of the parties as justified a court to award custody of the child to the mother. Oliphant v. Oliphant, 177 Ark. 613, 7 S.W.2d 783 (1928) (decision under prior law).

A chancellor had the right to retain control of a case involving custody of a child and, if there were changes in the conditions which made it necessary to do so, could change the custody of the child. Phifer v. Phifer, 198 Ark. 567, 129 S.W.2d 939 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court did not err when it failed to terminate the guardianship of a child by the child's paternal aunt and uncle and to establish the child's maternal grandparent as the guardian of the child because the court considered the testimony of the status of the child's circumstances and made a determination regarding the child's best interest.Smith v. Lovelace, 2014 Ark. App. 345 (2014).

Where the Arkansas Children's Home Society was appointed guardian of a dependent child under 14 years old, she was entitled to choose her own guardian when she reached the age of 14 years. Arkansas Children's Home Soc'y v. Walker, 146 Ark. 356, 225 S.W. 616 (1920) (decision under prior law).

In a contest between divorced parents over the custody of a 14-year-old daughter, the child's preference, while not controlling, could not be ignored, since, under former statute, she could select her own guardian if she had no parents. Patterson v. Cooper, 163 Ark. 364, 258 S.W. 988 (1924) (decision under prior law).

An award of custody to the mother of a 14-year-old girl who was hostile to the father would not be disturbed. Longinotti v. Longinotti, 169 Ark. 1001, 277 S.W. 41 (1925) (decision under prior law).

In awarding the custody of children of the age of discretion, as between their divorced parents, the courts would consider their preference for the father and hostility toward the mother even if induced by the father's conduct. Vilas v. Vilas, 184 Ark. 352, 42 S.W.2d 379 (1931) (decision under prior law).

The preference of a child, while not controlling, should be taken into account. Page v. Page, 210 Ark. 430, 196 S.W.2d 580 (1946) (decision under prior law).

Though a mother is the natural guardian of her children when their father is dead, she is not entitled to the care and custody of their estate unless she gives bond and qualifies as their guardian. Sparkman v. Roberts, 61 Ark. 26, 31 S.W. 742 (1895) (decision under prior law).

Custody divided between parents. Caldwell v. Caldwell, 156 Ark. 383, 246 S.W. 492 (1923) (decision under prior law).

If a father who has the custody of a child in this state dies, the mother is entitled to the custody of the child, if a fit person, whether she resides in the state or not. Hancock v. Hancock, 197 Ark. 853, 125 S.W.2d 104 (1939) (decision under prior law).

In a habeas corpus proceeding by a nonresident mother for the custody of her minor child, that respondent had been appointed guardian of the child by the probate court was no defense if the mother was a fit person to have the custody and control of the child. Hancock v. Hancock, 197 Ark. 853, 125 S.W.2d 104 (1939) (decision under prior law).

A parent however poor and humble, if able to support the child in his own style of life, and who is of good moral character could not be deprived of the privilege by anyone no matter how brilliant the advantage he could offer. Phifer v. Phifer, 198 Ark. 567, 129 S.W.2d 939 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Evidence insufficient to show unfitness of mother to have custody. Phifer v. Phifer, 198 Ark. 567, 129 S.W.2d 939 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Custody awarded to mother in preference to grandmother. Phifer v. Phifer, 198 Ark. 567, 129 S.W.2d 939 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Custody awarded to natural mother in preference to stepmother. Hancock v. Hancock, 198 Ark. 652, 130 S.W.2d 1 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Custody awarded to mother rather than father. Wimberly v. Wimberly, 202 Ark. 461, 151 S.W.2d 87 (1941) (decision under prior law).

A chancellor, in awarding the custody of an infant or in modifying such an award subsequently, must keep in view the welfare of the child and should confide his custody to the parent most suitable therefor, the right of each parent to his custody being of equal dignity. Kirby v. Kirby, 189 Ark. 937, 75 S.W.2d 817 (1934); Tilley v. Tilley, 210 Ark. 850, 198 S.W.2d 168 (1946) (decisions under prior law).

The rights of parents are not proprietary and are subject to their related duty to care for and protect the child, and the law secures their preferential rights only so long as they discharge their obligations. In re Guardianship of Markham, 32 Ark. App. 46, 795 S.W.2d 931 (1990).

The preference found in this section does not automatically attach to a child's natural parent; only a natural parent who is both qualified and, in the opinion of the probate court, suitable must be preferred over all others to be the child's guardian. Blunt v. Cartwright, 342 Ark. 662, 30 S.W.3d 737 (2000).

Paternal grandmother was not appointed the guardian of her grandchild because the mother was preferred under subsection (a) of this section, and a trial court did not find that the mother was unfit; evidence regarding the mother's shortcomings was largely controverted, and the trial court considered allegations that the mother had been deceptive to healthcare providers. Even though the mother's sexual relationships could have had a significant effect on the children in the household, the mother was married at the time of a final hearing.Marcellus v. Mays, 2012 Ark. App. 304, 419 S.W.3d 730 (2012).

In awarding permanent guardianship of a child to her paternal grandfather and step-grandmother, a court specifically addressed the suitability of the natural parents to be guardians over the child pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; an impediment to the mother being considered a qualified and suitable guardian was her relationship with the child's father.Wilson v. Wilson, 2013 Ark. App. 759, 431 S.W.3d 369 (2013).

In appointing a guardian, a trial court did not err by failing to consider a mother's fitness as a parent under the current interpretation of Arkansas guardianship laws. Even assuming that a finding on fitness was required, the evidence would have supported a finding that the mother was unfit based on her disbelief that her child had been sexually abused.Sherland v. Sherland, 2015 Ark. App. 342, 465 S.W.3d 3 (2015).

A sister had no statutory preference over the adopted son of an incompetent in the appointment of a guardian of the person and estate of the incompetent. McCartney v. Merchants & Planters Bank, 227 Ark. 80, 296 S.W.2d 407 (1956) (decision under prior law).

Evidence sufficient to support appointment of grandfather as guardian. Monroe v. Dallas, 6 Ark. App. 10, 636 S.W.2d 881 (1982) (decision under prior law).

Custody awarded to friends rather than grandparents. Bennett v. McGough, 281 Ark. 414, 664 S.W.2d 476 (1984) (decision under prior law).

Trial court's decision to appoint the grandparents as guardians was clearly erroneous where the evidence did not support a finding that the mother was an unfit parent; despite the fact that the grandparents may be able to provide certain advantages to the children, the mother should not be deprived of custody. Moore v. Sipes, 85 Ark. App. 15, 146 S.W.3d 903 (2004).
